Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5150.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Town of Raynham, acting by its Board of Selectmen, is hereby
authorized to lease 305 South Street East (Parcel 17-128-0 on the Assessors' Map) or a portion
thereof for a lease term up to 99 years.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1